Utah statutes.
4-9-12.   Unlawful acts specified.

A person may not:

(1)  sell, offer, or present for sale a commodity whose weight and measure is less than the weight and measure represented as being sold, offered, or exposed for sale;

(2)  misrepresent the price of a commodity sold, advertised, exposed, or offered for sale by weight, measure, or count, or to represent the price in a manner that misleads or deceives a person;

(3)  use or possess an incorrect weight or measure in commerce;

(4)  remove a tag, seal, or mark from a weight or measure without specific written authorization from the department;

(5)  hinder or obstruct an agent of the department dealing with weights and measures in the performance of the agent's duties; or

(6)  operate weights and measures in trade or commerce for the purpose of determining the weight or measure of a commodity without a valid weights and measures registration issued by the department.

